Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.1981

Intent—2009 c 548.

It is the intent of the legislature that specified policies and allocation formulas adopted under this chapter will constitute the legislature's definition of basic education under Article IX of the state Constitution once fully implemented. The legislature intends, however, to continue to review and revise the formulas and schedules and may make additional revisions, including revisions for technical purposes and consistency in the event of mathematical or other technical errors.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 413; 2009 c 548 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 ss 401-413: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.